Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3747
Commission; appointment of grower member; candidacy list; petition.

Any grower may place his or her
name on a candidacy list for appointment as a grower member of the commission
by filing a petition signed by at least ten resident bean growers (1) from
the district in which he or she resides for an appointment under subsection
(1) of section 2-3746 or (2) from the district in which he or she resides
or the other district to be represented for an appointment under subsection
(2) of section 2-3746. The petition shall be filed with the commission. The
Governor and the commission shall make appointments from the candidacy list
unless there are no names on the list.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB394, § 3.